Utah statutes.
34-23-205.   Permitted occupations for minors 12 or older.

Minors 12 years of age or older may work in occupations such as:

(1)  the sale and delivery of periodicals;

(2)  door-to-door sale and delivery of merchandise;

(3)  baby-sitting;

(4)  nonhazardous agricultural work; and

(5)  any other occupation not determined harmful by the division.

